dictsource/ce_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Chechen


.group а
   а       a
   а (C_   @-
   а (CC_  @-
   ай      @I
   аь      &

.group б
   б       b

.group в
   в       v

.group г
   г       g
   гӏ      Q

.group д
   д       d

.group е
   _) е    je
   е       iE
  пӏ) е    E
   ш) е    E

.group ё
   ё       jo

.group ж
   ж       Z

.group з
   з       z

.group и
   и       I
   ий      i:

.group й
   й       j

.group к
   к       k
   кк      k:
   кх      q
   къ      q`
   кӏ      k`
   ккх     q:

.group л
   л       l

.group м
   м       m

.group н
   н       n

.group о
   о       o
   C) о    wo
   й) о    o
   м) о    uO
   н) о    o
   ов      OU
   оь      W

.group п
   п       p
   пп      p:
   пӏ      p`

.group р
   р       r
   рхӏ     r#

.group с
   с       s
   сс      s:

.group т
   т       t
   тт      t:
   тӏ      t`

.group у
   у       u
   ув      u:
   уь      y
   уьй     y:

.group ф
   ф       f

.group х
   х       x
   хь      H
   хӏ      h

.group ц
   ц       ts
   цӏ      ts`

.group ч
   ч       tS
   чӏ      tS`

.group ш
   ш       S

.group щ
   щ       StS

.group ъ
   ъ       ?

.group ы
   ы       @

.group ь
   ь

.group э
   э       e

.group ю
   ю       ju
   юь      jy

.group я
   я       ja
   яь      j&

.group ӏ
   ӏ       A
